District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.13

Task force to combat fraud.

(a)

The Mayor shall form a task force for the following purposes:

(1)

Collecting information on telephone fraud;

(2)

Taking steps to educate the public about fraud, including telephone fraud;

(3)

Sharing information related to telephone fraud with District government agencies;

(4)

Sharing information related to telephone fraud with other state and federal law enforcement agencies; and

(5)

Advising the Mayor on enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The task force may include representatives from the following agencies:

(1)

Metropolitan Police Department;

(2)

Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs;

(3)

Office of Corporation Counsel; and

(4)

Any other agency the Mayor deems appropriate.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126m
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039